Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.170

Petition—Size.

Each recall petition at the time of circulating, signing, and filing with the officer with whom it is to be filed, must consist of not more than five sheets with numbered lines for not more than twenty signatures on each sheet, with the prescribed warning, title, and form of petition on each sheet, and a full, true, and correct copy of the original statement of the charges against the officer referred to therein, printed on sheets of paper of like size and quality as the petition, firmly fastened together.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1413; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.040. Prior: 1913 c 146 s 6; RRS s 5355. Formerly RCW 29.82.040.]